Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB933.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 32AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READER SYSTEMSSec.3201. Purpose.3202. Definitions.3203. Permits.§ 3201. Purpose. This chapter establishes a system for the issuance of permits for automated license plate readers on trafficways.§ 3202. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated license plate reader system." A system of automated high-speed cameras combined with data processing to convert images of license plates and vehicles into computer-readable data. For the purposes of this section, automated license plate reader systems are only those used by a government agency and do not refer to electronic devices used solely for traffic violations or tolling purposes."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Government agency." A Commonwealth agency, law enforcement agency, transportation authority or agency, or a political subdivision or municipal or other local authority or agency of any political subdivision or local authority."MASH-tested poles." Poles that have been crash tested according to the Manual for Assessing Safety Hardware (MASH) established by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials."Political subdivision." As defined in section 9004.1(e) (relating to political subdivision and volunteer service use of tax-free motor fuels) . "State designated highway." As defined in section 102 (relating to definitions).§ 3203. Permits.(a) Installation.--The department shall have the power and duty to permit the installation of automated license plate reader systems on State designated highways.(b) Permits.--The department shall establish a permitting process for the installation of automated license plate reader 20250SB0933PN1052 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems on State designated highways.(c) Requirements.--The permitting process under subsection (b) shall include the following:(1) MASH-tested poles are required to support cameras in areas without barriers.(2) Non-MASH-tested poles are permitted only if located behind a barrier, including guardrails or curb, and gutter.(3) Poles must be installed at least 12 feet from the edge of the nearest travel lane if there is no curb or barrier.(4) Poles must be installed at least four feet from a curb or barrier.(5) Cameras may be affixed to existing infrastructure only if proper approvals are obtained from the authorities with jurisdiction or ownership over the existing infrastructure.(6) Third parties may submit permit applications on behalf of a government agency only if the third party has obtained a letter of authorization signed by the government agency.(7) Single umbrella permits may be utilized for multiple locations within the same political subdivision.(d) Review.--The department shall follow a 30-day review period for permit applications.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0933PN1052 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425